finished/tgl.foma
def Tags "[V]" | "[AGFOC]" | "[PFOC]" | "[PFV]" | "[IPFV]" | "[LGSPEC1]" | "[NFIN]" | "-in-" | "-um-" | "-in" | "nag-" | "i-" | "-an" | "mag-" | "na-" | "ma-" | "nang-" | "mang-" | "naka-" | "maka-" | "nan-" | "man-" | "ni-" | "|" | R;

def Alphabet [% |%'|%-|a|b|d|e|g|h|i|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|u|w|y|á|í|ó|ú];
def C [b|d|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|t|w];
def V [a|e|i|o|u|y|á|í|ó|ú];

read lexc tgl.lexc
def Lex;

def InsertHyphen [..] -> "-" || .#. [m|n] a g _ V;

# Before Reduplication
def RedupMark   (C | n g) V @-> %< ... %> || .#. _ ?* R;
def RedupInsert [..] -> %< (C | n g) V %> || .#. _ %<;

# útot[V][PFOC][LGSPEC1] úútot|inR-in

# After Reduplication
def Destress ú -> u || %< C* _ %> %< C* ú %> .o. 
             á -> a || %< C* _ %> %< C* á %> .o. 
			 í -> i || %< C* _ %> %< C* í %> .o. 
			 ó -> o || %< C* _ %> %< C* ó %> ;
			 
#def KtoG     k -> g || %< _ ?* ["man-"|"nan-"];

def NAGp  [..] -> n a g "-" || .#. _ ?* "nag-" ;
def MAGp  [..] -> m a g "-" || .#. _ ?* "mag-" ;
def NAp   [..] -> n a || .#. _ ?* "na-" ;
def MAp   [..] -> m a || .#. _ ?* "ma-" ;
def NANGp [..] -> n a n g "-" || .#. _ ?* "nang-" ;
def MANGp [..] -> m a n g "-" || .#. _ ?* "mang-" ;
def NAKAp [..] -> n a k a || .#. _ ?* "naka-" ;
def MAKAp [..] -> m a k a || .#. _ ?* "maka-" ;
def NANp  [..] -> n a n "-" || .#. _ ?* "nan-" ;
def MANp  [..] -> m a n "-" || .#. _ ?* "man-" ;
def Ip    [..] -> i || .#. _ ?* "i-" ;
def NIp   [..] -> n i || .#. _ ?* "ni-" ;

def DeHyphen "-" -> 0 || _ \V;
def UMi [..] -> u m || .#. \V* _ V ?* "-um-" ;
def INi [..] -> i n || .#. \V* _ V ?* "-in-" ;
def INs [..] -> i n || %| _ ?* "-in" ;
def ANs [..] -> a n || %| _ ?* "-an" ;

def OURule  o -> u, ó -> ú ||  \[o|u] _ (C|n g) %| [a n | i n];  # dinalohan > dinaluhan
def HInsert [..] -> h || [V-y] _ %| [a n | i n];  # tinanggian > tinanggihan
def DRRule  d -> r || _ %| [a n | i n];       # huhubadin > huhubarin
def Apostrophe %' -> 0 || _ %| [a n | i n] ;
def Syncope i -> 0 || V C _  [p|t] [a n];  # This might be too irregular
# maybe only kpan, ktan, ksan, bhan, lhin, mtan
def Syncope V -> 0 || k _ [p|t|s] a n , b _ h a n , l _ h i n , m _ t a n ;

def PreRedup   Lex .o. RedupMark .o. RedupInsert ;

def Cleanup Tags -> 0;

def Grammar _eq(PreRedup, %<, %>) .o. Destress .o. %<|%> -> 0 .o. NAGp .o. MAGp .o. NANGp .o. MANGp .o. NAKAp .o. MAKAp .o. NANp .o. MANp .o. NAp .o. MAp .o. NIp .o. DeHyphen .o. UMi .o. INi .o. Ip .o. INs .o. ANs .o. HInsert .o. DRRule .o.  Apostrophe .o. OURule .o. Cleanup .o. Syncope;

def GuessNFIN Alphabet+ ["[V]" "[NFIN]"]:0;
regex Grammar .P. GuessNFIN;

save stack tgl.fomabin
